Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-113
Division; engineering and technical services; availability.

The division may, insofar as is reasonably possible, offer its engineering or other technical services, without charge, to any municipality or to any person owning a privately owned public use airport desiring them in connection with the construction, maintenance, or operation or the proposed construction, maintenance, or operation of an airport or restricted landing area.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(7), p. 84;

Laws 1995, LB 609, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 12.
July 1, 2017